Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2755YH (5) 91 as/js H.F. 748 Section 1. Section 726.6, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 A person who is the parent, guardian, or person having 3 custody or control over a child or a minor under the age of 4 eighteen with a mental or physical disability, except as 5 provided in paragraph âdâ , or a person who is a member of the 6 household in which a child or such a minor resides, commits 7 child endangerment when the person does any of the following: 8 Sec. 2. Section 726.6, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2025, 9 is amended to read as follows: 10 d. Willfully deprives a any child or minor under the age of 11 eighteen, whether the child or minor has a mental or physical 12 disability or not, of necessary food, clothing, shelter, health 13 care or supervision appropriate to the child or minorâs age, 14 when the person is reasonably able to make the necessary 15 provisions and which deprivation substantially harms the child 16 or minorâs physical, mental , or emotional health. For purposes 17 of this paragraph, the failure to provide specific medical 18 treatment shall not for that reason alone be considered willful 19 deprivation of health care if the person can show that such 20 treatment would conflict with the tenets and practice of a 21 recognized religious denomination of which the person is an 22 adherent or member. This exception does not in any manner 23 restrict the right of an interested party to petition the court 24 on behalf of the best interest of the child or minor. 25 Sec. 3. Section 726.6, subsections 7 and 8, Code 2025, are 26 amended to read as follows: 27 7. A person who commits child endangerment resulting in 28 bodily injury to a child or minor or child endangerment in 29 violation of subsection 1 , paragraph âgâ âdâ , that does not 30 result in a serious injury, or a person who commits child 31 endangerment in violation of subsection 2 , is guilty of a class 32 âDâ âCâ felony. 33 8. A person who commits child endangerment that is not 34 subject to penalty under subsection 5, 6, or 7 is guilty of an 35 -1- LSB 2755YH (5) 91 as/js 1/ 3 H.F. 748 aggravated misdemeanor resulting in bodily injury to a child 1 or minor, or child endangerment in violation of subsection 2 1, paragraph âgâ , that does not result in serious injury, 3 or a person who commits child endangerment in violation of 4 subsection 2, is guilty of a class âDâ felony . 5 Sec. 4. Section 726.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. A person who commits child endangerment 8 that is not subject to penalty under subsection 5, 6, 7, or 8 is 9 guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 10